Vermont statutes. Title 12 Court Procedure
Subchapter 2. Procedure on Trustee Process

§§ 3051-3059.
Repealed.
1971, No. 185 (Adj. Sess.), § 237, eff. March 29, 1972.

§ 3060.
Repealed.
1973, No. 249 (Adj. Sess.), § 111, eff. April 9, 1974.

§ 3061.
Repealed.
1971, No. 185 (Adj. Sess.), § 237, eff. March 29, 1972.

§ 3062.
Default of trustee—Adjudgment as trustee.

When a person summoned as trustee does not serve his or her disclosure within such time as the Supreme Court may by rule provide, he or she shall be defaulted and adjudged a trustee.

HISTORY:

Amended

1971, No. 185

(Adj. Sess.), § 79, eff. March 29, 1972.

§ 3063.
Amount of judgment; execution.

When a person is adjudged trustee by default, the judgment shall be for the amount of damages and costs recovered by the plaintiff in the action, and payable in money at the time the judgment is rendered against the principal defendant. Execution therefor may issue directly against the goods, chattels, or estate of the trustee.

§ 3064.
Sworn disclosure; general denial; examination; discharge.

When an alleged trustee serves his or her written disclosure under oath declaring that he or she had not at the time of the service of the summons, nor has since had in his or her hands or possession any goods, effects, or credits of the defendant, and submits himself or herself thereupon to examination upon oath, he or she shall be discharged if the plaintiff should decline to examine him or her, or if his or her disclosure appears to be true upon examination and further proceedings. If the plaintiff examines the alleged trustee thereon, he or she shall propose interrogatories in writing, which shall be answered in writing, signed by the trustee, and sworn to by him or her in open court or before a person authorized by law to administer oaths.

HISTORY:

Amended

1971, No. 185

(Adj. Sess.), § 80, eff. March 29, 1972.

§ 3065.
Admission; statement of facts.

When an alleged trustee serves his or her written disclosure under oath admitting that he or she has in his or her hands or possession goods, effects, or credits of the defendant, or referring that question to the court upon the facts, his or her disclosure may set forth such facts as he or she deems material, and he or she may submit himself or herself thereupon to a further examination on oath.
The plaintiff may propose interrogatories in writing, to be answered as provided in section 3064 of this title.

HISTORY:

Amended

1971, No. 185

(Adj. Sess.), § 81, eff. March 29, 1972.

§ 3066.
Answers and statements of trustee not conclusive.

The answers and statements sworn to by a person summoned as trustee shall not be conclusive in deciding how far he or she is chargeable, but either party may allege and prove facts material to that issue.

§ 3067.
Trial of issues by jury or court.

Questions of fact arising upon such additional allegations may be tried by the court, or in the discretion of the court, may be submitted to a jury in such manner as the court directs, in cases where a commissioner has not been appointed.

§ 3068.
Disclosure before judge in Superior Court action.

A person summoned to appear before the Superior Court as trustee may appear before a Superior judge, competent to try causes between the parties, and with the consent of the parties, certified by such judge, make his or her written disclosure, upon oath. On its being filed with the clerk of the court, such trustee shall not be required to appear before the court, except for the purpose of explaining or correcting his or her disclosure, and the same proceedings shall be had as if taken in Superior Court.

HISTORY:

Amended

1965, No. 194

, § 10, eff. July 1, 1965, operative Feb. 1, 1967; 1973, No 193 (Adj. Sess.), § 3, eff. April 9, 1974;

1973, No. 249

(Adj. Sess.), § 20, eff. April 9, 1974.

§ 3069.
Corporations summoned as trustees.

A corporation may appear by its cashier, treasurer, clerk, or such officer as it appoints, or as the court requires.
The answer, disclosure, and examination on oath of such officers shall be received as the answer, disclosure, and examination of the corporation.

§ 3070.
Commissioners—Appointment.

When a person summoned as trustee in Superior Court appears and files a disclosure denying his or her liability, or submits such question to the court upon a statement of facts, the court in its discretion may, or upon application of the plaintiff, trustee, or claimant shall, appoint one or more commissioners, who shall hear the testimony adduced by the parties as to the trustee’s liability or the right of the claimant, determine questions with reference thereto, and report to the court the facts with their decision thereon.

HISTORY:

Amended

1973, No. 193

(Adj. Sess.), § 3, eff. April 9, 1974.

§ 3071.
Powers and duties of commissioner.

A commissioner may summon the trustee to appear before him or her and make disclosure; and if, after reasonable notice from the commissioner, he or she does not appear, or, appearing, does not make disclosure, the commissioner shall report the fact to the court.
Thereupon, unless cause is shown to the contrary, the court shall render judgment as in case of default against the trustee.
When the trustee appears before the commissioner and does not answer the interrogatories proposed by the plaintiff or commissioner, such failure to answer, relative to the particular matter to which such answer is required, shall be taken against him or her.

§ 3072.
Taking and return of disclosure.

The commissioner shall take the disclosure of the trustee in writing, and certify and return the same to the court with his or her report.

§ 3073.
Judgment on disclosure and commissioner’s report.

When the commissioner has returned to the court the disclosure of the trustee, with the report of the facts and his or her decision thereon, if cause is not shown to the contrary, judgment with costs shall be rendered on such report according to the rights of the parties.

§ 3074.
Disclosure not evidence in a prosecution.

The disclosure upon oath of a trustee in any action in which he or she is summoned shall not be used as evidence to prove any fact therein stated, in a prosecution against him or her for a crime or penalty.

§ 3075.
Value less than $10.00; discharge of trustee; costs.

When the goods, effects, and credits in the hands of the trustee do not exceed $10.00 in value, the trustee shall be discharged with costs against the plaintiff.
The provision of this section shall not affect a trustee process for the collection of taxes.

§ 3076.
Trustee liable only for balance due.

A trustee may deduct from the goods, effects, and credits in his or her hands his or her demands against the defendant founded on contract, express or implied, and shall be liable for the balance only after such demands are adjusted.

Partnership claim.

Where several trustees, summoned under trustee statute, disclosed a joint indebtedness to principal debtor, and one of trustees claimed that principal debtor was indebted to himself and third person, as partners, such individual trustee would not be allowed to set off this claim against joint indebtedness of himself and his cotrustees. Wells v. Mace, 17 Vt. 503, 1845 Vt. LEXIS 68 (1845), rev'd, 48 U.S. 272, 12 L. Ed. 698, 7 How. 272, 1849 U.S. LEXIS 348 (1848).

§ 3077.
Payments by trustee after service.

When, after service on the trustee but before he or she has knowledge thereof, he or she, in good faith, makes payment or becomes liable to a third person on account of the goods, effects, or credits in his or her hands or delivers the same to the defendant or to any other person entitled thereto, he or she shall be allowed therefor as if the payment or delivery had been made or the liability incurred, before the service of the process on him or her.

§ 3078.
Judgment on money demands—Amount; when payable.

When a person is adjudged trustee on account of money due to the defendant at a future day, the court shall determine the amount which the trustee shall pay on the judgment and the time when the same shall be paid.

§ 3079.
Liability of trustee on failure to pay.

When the trustee does not pay such sum by the time specified, when required by the officer serving the execution, he or she shall be liable to the plaintiff for the same with interest in an action of contract on this statute.

§ 3080.
Execution against trustee.

When a person is adjudged trustee on account of money due the defendant at the time judgment is rendered, the court shall determine the amount which the trustee shall pay on such judgment, and execution may issue directly against the goods, chattels, or estate of the trustee for the same.
When execution issues against the defendant, the amount of the judgment against the trustee shall be certified thereon.

§ 3081.
Judgment against trustee; effect on defendant’s demand.

The judgment against a person as trustee shall discharge him or her from demands by the defendant for goods, effects, and credits paid, delivered or accounted for by the trustee, by force of the judgment; and if he or she is afterwards sued therefor by the defendant or his or her representatives, the judgment shall constitute a defense.

HISTORY:

Amended

1971, No. 185

(Adj. Sess.), § 82, eff. March 29, 1972.

§ 3082.
Discharge of trustee; effect on defendant’s demand.

When a person summoned as trustee is discharged, the judgment shall not be a bar to an action brought against him or her by the defendant for the same demand.

§ 3083.
Costs—Allowed to trustee.

When a person summoned as trustee appears and submits to examination upon oath, he or she shall be allowed his or her costs for travel and attendance, and such further sum as the court deems reasonable for his or her counsel fees and other necessary expenses.

§ 3084.
Retention out of funds in trustee’s hands.

When a person is adjudged a trustee, his or her costs and charges shall be retained out of the goods, effects, and credits in his or her hands, and he or she shall be chargeable on execution for the balance.

§ 3085.
Retention of property until costs paid.

When a person is adjudged trustee on account of specific articles of personal property, he or she shall not be obliged to deliver the same to the officer serving the execution until his or her costs and charges are fully paid or tendered.

§ 3086.
Judgment for costs of discharged trustee.

When the trustee is discharged, he or she shall recover judgment against the plaintiff for his or her costs and charges and have execution therefor.

§ 3087.
Recognizance for trustee’s costs.

The plaintiff in a trustee process shall give security for costs to the trustee by way of recognizance by some person other than the plaintiff. The security shall be in the sum of $50.00 for a summons returnable to a Superior Court. If trustee process issues without a minute of the recognizance, with the name of the surety and the sum in which he or she is bound, signed by the clerk thereon, the trustee shall be discharged.

HISTORY:

Amended

1971, No. 185

(Adj. Sess.), § 83, eff. March 29, 1972;

1973, No. 193

(Adj. Sess.), § 3, eff. April 9, 1974; No. 249 (Adj. Sess.), § 21, eff. April 9, 1974;

2009, No. 154

(Adj. Sess.), § 78.

§ 3088.
Plaintiff’s costs not to exceed damages.

The plaintiff in a trustee process shall not recover a greater sum for costs, including costs allowed to the trustee, than the amount of damages recovered.